Hawaii statutes.
§201H-12 Development of property. (a)
The corporation, in its own behalf or on behalf of any federal, state, or
county agency, may:

(1) Clear, improve, and rehabilitate property;

(2) Plan, develop,
construct, and finance housing projects, including mixed-use developments; and

(3) In cooperation with any state or county
department or agency, including the department of education and department of
accounting and general services, plan facilities and related infrastructure as
an integral part of its housing projects, including mixed-use developments,
using all its innovative powers toward achieving that end expeditiously and
economically; provided that facilities developed in cooperation with the
department of education comply with the department of education's educational
objectives and requirements.

For purposes of this
subsection, "mixed-use
developments" means a development that contains affordable residential
dwelling units that may be combined with governmental, educational, commercial,
cultural, institutional, or industrial uses; is approved by the county in which
the project is located; and is subject to: chapter 104; title 40 United States
Code sections 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3146, and 3147; or a project labor
agreement by law or contract in the construction of the project.

(b) The corporation may develop public land in
an agricultural district subject to the prior approval of the land use
commission, when developing lands greater than fifteen acres in size, and
public land in a conservation district subject to the prior approval of the
board of land and natural resources. The corporation shall not develop state
monuments, historical sites, or parks. When the corporation proposes to
develop public land, it shall file with the department of land and natural
resources a petition setting forth the purpose for the development. The
petition shall be conclusive proof that the intended use is a public use
superior to that which the land has been appropriated.

(c) The corporation may develop or assist in
the development of federal lands with the approval of appropriate federal
authorities.

(d) The corporation shall not develop any
public land where the development may endanger the receipt of any federal
grant, impair the eligibility of any government agency for a federal grant,
prevent the participation of the federal government in any government program,
or impair any covenant between the government and the holder of any bond issued
by the government.

(e) The corporation may contract or sponsor with
any county, housing authority, or person, subject to the availability of funds,
an experimental or demonstration housing project designed to meet the needs of
elders; the disabled; displaced or homeless persons; low- and moderate-income
persons; teachers or other government employees; or university and college
students and faculty. [L 2005, c 196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §10; am L
2016, c 131, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next